src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kand_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - kand: # nouns 94 '(eng) stump / (fin) kanta' 
    kand+N+Sg+Nom: kand
    kand+N+Sg+Gen: kand
    kand+N+Sg+Par: kandõ
    kand+N+Sg+Dat: kandõn
    kand+N+Sg+Ins: kandkõks
    kand+N+Sg+Ill: kandõ
    kand+N+Sg+Ela: kandstõ
    kand+N+Pl+Nom: kāndõd
    kand+N+Pl+Gen: kāndõd
    kand+N+Pl+Par: kāndidi
    kand+N+Pl+Dat: kāndõdõn
    kand+N+Pl+Ins: kāndõdõks
    kand+N+Pl+Ill: kāndiž
    kand+N+Pl+Ela: kāndist
